Georgia, session 2025_26, HB682.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 2 of Chapter 10 of Title 17 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the
death penalty generally, is amended by revising Code Section 17-10-30, relating to the
procedure for imposition of death penalty generally, by adding a new subsection to read as
follows:
"(d) The death penalty shall not be imposed in cases in which the only evidence of a
defendant's guilt is the testimony of a single eyewitness."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 682
- 1 -